Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB802.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b)(12) and (c) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under 123456789101112131415161718192021 this act:* * *(12) Notes and working papers prepared by or for a public official or agency employee used:(i) solely for that official's or employee's own personal use, including telephone message slips, routing slips and other materials that do not have an official purpose[.]; or(ii) to assist an individual with a disability, including transcriptions, braille translations or large print materials.* * *(31) A record or information that would disclose the identity of a claimant or victim in an executed agreement that settles a sexual harassment or sexual assault claim.(c) Financial records.--The exceptions set forth in subsection (b) shall not apply to financial records, except that an agency may redact that portion of a financial record protected under subsection (b)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (16) [or], (17) or (31). An agency shall not disclose the identity of an individual performing an undercover or covert law enforcement activity.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0802PN0830 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324